Georgia, session 2025_26, HB322.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 11 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to dentists, dental
hygienists, and dental assistants, is amended by revising Code Section 43-11-42, relating to
reciprocity and criminal background check, as follows:
"43-11-42.
(a)(1) The board may issue, in its discretion, without examination, a teacher's or
instructor's license to a dental hygienist who has graduated from a school or college
approved by the board and accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the
American Dental Association (ADA) or its successor agency, if any, for the sole purpose
H. B. 322
- 1 -

LC 46 1066
of teaching or instructing, in an accredited dental hygiene school in this state, those
procedures and services recognized in this state to be within the scope of practice of such
person's professional license.
(2) Applicants who have graduated from a dental hygiene school not so accredited as
described in paragraph (1) of subsection (a) of this Code section must comply with the
following requirements in order to submit an application for such teacher's or instructor's
license:
(A) The applicant is or has been licensed to practice dental hygiene in another state,
country, or territory;
(B) The applicant shall submit a letter of recommendation from the dean or director of
the teaching institution at which he or she is seeking employment along with
verification of an executed employment offer for the full-time or part-time position that
the applicant is applying to fill. Such recommendation shall verify that the applicant
has met or been approved under the credentialing standards of a dental hygiene school
or teaching institution with which the person is to be affiliated; such dental hygiene
school or teaching institution shall be accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association or The Joint Commission;
(C) The applicant has never failed the Georgia dental hygiene licensure examination;
and
(D) The applicant has never had a dental hygiene license revoked in this state or
another state, country, or territory;
(3) The board may establish by rule or regulation the requirements for documentation of
an applicant's educational and personal qualifications for licensure under this subsection.
(4) In order to be granted a license under this subsection, all applicants shall pass a
jurisprudence examination on the laws of this state and rules and regulations as they
relate to the practice of dental hygiene as established or approved by the board, which
shall be administered in the English language.
H. B. 322
- 2 -

LC 46 1066
(a.1)(1) The board may issue, in its discretion, without examination, a teacher's or
instructor's license to a dentist who has graduated from a school, college, or advanced
dental education program approved by the board and accredited by the Commission on
Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association (ADA) or its successor agency,
if any, for the sole purpose of teaching or instructing, in an accredited dental college,
advanced dental education program, or training clinic in this state, those procedures and
services recognized in this state to be within the scope of practice of such person's
professional license. Those applicants who have received a doctoral degree in dentistry
from a dental school not so accredited must comply with the following requirements in
order to submit an application for licensure such teacher's or instructor' license:
(A)(i) Successful completion at an accredited dental school approved by the board
of the last two years of a program leading to the doctor of dental surgery (D.D.S.) or
doctor of dental medicine (D.M.D.) degree; or
(ii) Successful completion at an accredited dental school or college approved by the
board of at least a two-year advanced education program in one of the dental
specialties recognized by the American Dental Association (ADA) or in an advanced
dental education program in general dentistry; or
(iii) Successful completion of at least two one-year advanced dental education
programs in general dentistry at an accredited dental school or college approved by
the board; or
(iv) Successful completion of a one-year program in operative dentistry at a dental
school or college approved by the board and a one-year advanced dental education
program in general dentistry at an accredited dental school or college approved by the
board; and
(B) Certification by the dean of the accredited dental school where such supplementary
program was taken that the candidate has achieved the same level of didactic and
H. B. 322
- 3 -

LC 46 1066
clinical competency as expected of a graduate of the school receiving a doctor of dental
surgery (D.D.S.) or doctor of dental medicine (D.M.D.) degree.
(A) The applicant is or has been licensed to practice dentistry in another state, country,
or territory;
(B) The applicant shall submit a letter of recommendation from the dean or director of
the teaching institution at which he or she is seeking employment along with
verification of an executed employment offer for the full-time or part-time position that
the applicant is applying to fill. Such recommendation shall verify that the applicant
has met or been approved under the credentialing standards of a dental school or an
academic medical center with which the person is to be affiliated; such dental school
or academic medical center shall be accredited by the Commission on Dental
Accreditation of the American Dental Association or The Joint Commission;
(C) The applicant has never failed the Georgia dental licensure examination;
(D) The applicant has never had a dental license revoked in this state or another state,
country, or territory; and
(E) The applicant shall have a current cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR)
certification.
(2) The board may establish by rule or regulation the requirements for documentation of
an applicant's educational and personal qualifications for licensure under this subsection.
(3) In order to be granted a license under this subsection, all applicants must shall pass
a jurisprudence examination on the laws of this state and rules and regulations as they
relate to the practice of dentistry as established or approved by the board, which shall be
administered in the English language.
(b) Any license issued under subsection (a) or (a.1) of this Code section authorizes the
licensee to provide dental hygiene services or practice dentistry, respectively, only while
engaged in the performance of the licensee's duties as an employee of the accredited school
or college or only in connection with programs or training clinics affiliated with or
H. B. 322
- 4 -

LC 46 1066
endorsed by such school or college. Such licensee shall not practice dentistry or provide
dental hygiene services with such license outside of such authorization.
(b)(c) The board may issue, in its discretion, without examination, a license to dentists for
100 the sole purpose of practicing public health dentistry in an official state or a local health
101 department or to render dental services to patients in state operated eleemosynary or
102 correctional institutions, provided that these dentists possess a license in another state, are
103 in good standing in said state, and have graduated from an accredited dental college. Such
104 license shall be considered to be a temporary license which shall be valid for a period to
105 be established by board rule.
106 (c)(d) The cost of such teacher's, instructor's, or temporary public health license shall be
107 established by the board.
108 (d)(e) Any license issued or considered for issuance under this Code section shall be
109 subject to the provisions set forth in Code Section 43-11-47.
110 (e)(f) Application for a license under this Code section shall constitute consent for
111 performance of a criminal background check. Each applicant who submits an application
112 to the board for licensure agrees to provide the board with any and all information
113 necessary to run a criminal background check, including but not limited to classifiable sets
114 of fingerprints. The applicant shall be responsible for all fees associated with the
115 performance of a background check."
116 SECTION 2.
117 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 322
- 5 -